Hawaii statutes.
§514B-84 Developer's public report; special
types of condominiums. (a) In addition to the information required by
section 514B‑83, the developer's public report for a project containing
any existing structures being converted to condominium status shall contain:

(1) Regarding units that may be occupied for
residential use and that have been in existence for five years or more:

(A) A statement by the developer, based upon
a report prepared by a Hawaii-licensed architect or engineer, describing the
present condition of all structural components and mechanical and electrical
installations material to the use and enjoyment of the units;

(B) A statement by the developer of the
expected useful life of each item reported on in subparagraph (A) or a statement
that no representations are made in that regard; and

(C) A list of any outstanding notices of
uncured violations of building code or other county regulations, together with
the estimated cost of curing these violations;

(2) Regarding all projects containing converted
structures, a verified statement signed by an appropriate county official that:

(A) The structures are in compliance with all
zoning and building ordinances and codes applicable to the project at the time
it was built, and specifying, if applicable:

(i) Any variances or other permits that have
been granted to achieve compliance;

(ii) Whether the project contains any legal
nonconforming uses or structures as a result of the adoption or amendment of
any ordinances or codes; and

(iii) Any violations of current zoning or
building ordinances or codes and the conditions required to bring the structure
into compliance; or

(B) Based on the available information, the
county official cannot make a determination with respect to the matters
described in subparagraph (A); and

(3) Other disclosures and information that the
commission may require.

(b) In addition to the information required by
section 514B‑83, the developer's public report for a project in the
agricultural district pursuant to chapter 205 shall disclose:

(1) Whether the structures and uses anticipated by
the developer's promotional plan for the project are in compliance with all
applicable state and county land use laws and with chapter 205, including
section 205-4.6 where applicable;

(2) Whether the structures and uses anticipated by
the developer's promotional plan for the project are in compliance with all
applicable county real property tax laws, and the penalties for noncompliance;
and

(3) Other disclosures and information that the
commission may require.

(c) In addition to the information required by
section 514B‑83, the developer's public report for a project containing
any assisted living facility units regulated or to be regulated pursuant to
rules adopted under section 321‑11(10) shall disclose:

(1) Any licensing requirements and the impact of the
requirements on the costs, operations, management, and governance of the
project;

(2) The nature and scope of services to be provided;

(3) Additional costs, directly attributable to the
services, to be included in the association's common expenses;

(4) The duration of the provision of the services;

(5) Any other information the developer deems
appropriate to describe the possible impacts on the project resulting from the
provision of the services; and

(6) Other disclosures and information that the
commission may require. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §4; am L 2014, c 49, §9]

Note

Applicability of 2014 amendment. L 2014, c 49, §10.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next